vi: Kiểu hỗ trợ cổ tay: Nẹp; Găng tay; Lớp lót; Dụng cụ định vị; Ống bảo vệ; Băng dính; Băng quấn; Khác
pt-PT: Estilo de suporte de pulso: Ortótese; Luva; Forro; Posicionador; Manga; Fita; Ligadura; Outro
ja: 手首サポートのスタイル: ブレース; グローブ; ライナー; ポジショナー; スリーブ; テープ; ラップ; その他
de: Art der Handgelenkstütze: Schiene; Handschuh; Unterzieher; Positionierer; Manschette; Tape; Bandage; Sonstige
en: Wrist support style: Brace; Glove; Liner; Positioner; Sleeve; Tape; Wrap; Other
nb: Type håndleddsstøtte: Skinne; Hanske; Fôr; Posisjoneringsstøtte; Erme; Teip; Bind; Annet
ko: 손목 보호대 방식: 보조기; 장갑; 라이너; 포지셔너; 슬리브; 테이프; 랩; 기타
hr-HR: Stil podrške za zglob: Ortoza; Rukavica; Podstava; Pozicioner; Steznik; Traka; Bandaža; Ostalo
es: Estilo de muñequera: Férula; Guante; Forro; Posicionador; Manga; Cinta; Venda; Otro
sl-SI: Stil podpore za zapestje: Opornica; Rokavica; Podloga; Pozicionirnik; Rokav; Trak; Trak za ovijanje; Drugo
pl: Styl wsparcia nadgarstka: Orteza; Rękawiczka; Wkładka; Pozycjoner; Opaska; Taśma; Owijka; Inne
fi: Rannetuen tyyli: Lasta; Käsine; Aluskäsine; Asennoitin; Hiha; Teippi; Kääre; Muu
sk-SK: Štýl podpory zápästia: Ortéza; Rukavica; Vložka; Polohovadlo; Návlek; Páska; Bandáž; Iné
el: Στυλ υποστήριξης καρπού: Νάρθηκας; Γάντι; Επένδυση; Ρυθμιστής θέσης; Μανίκι; Ταινία; Επίδεσμος; Άλλο
ru: Стиль поддержки запястья: Бандаж; Перчатка; Вкладыш; Позиционер; Рукав; Тейп; Обмотка; Другое
zh-CN: 手腕支撑样式: 支具; 手套; 衬垫; 定位器; 护套; 胶带; 缠绕带; 其他
lt-LT: Riešo atramos tipas: Įtvaras; Pirštinė; Įdėklas; Padėties fiksatorius; Mova; Teipas; Vyniojamas įtvaras; Kita
da: Stil for håndledsstøtte: Skinne; Handske; Indlæg; Positioneringsstøtte; Sleeve; Tape; Bind; Andet
tr: Bilek destek stili: Atel; Eldiven; Astar; Konumlandırıcı; Kolluk; Bant; Sargı; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил за поддръжка на китката: Шина; Ръкавица; Подложка; Позиционер; Ръкав; Лента; Накитник; Други
zh-TW: 護腕樣式: 護具; 手套; 內襯; 定位器; 護套; 貼布; 纏帶; 其他
hu: Csuklótámasz stílus: Rögzítő; Kesztyű; Bélés; Pozicionáló; Hüvely; Szalag; Bandázs; Egyéb
sv: Typ av handledsstöd: Stödskena; Handske; Foder; Positionerare; Stödförband; Tejp; Linda; Övrigt
cs: Styl podpory zápěstí: Ortéza; Rukavice; Vložka; Polohovač; Návlek; Tejp; Omotávka; Jiné
ro-RO: Stilul de suport pentru încheietură: Orteză; Mănușă; Căptușeală; Dispozitiv de poziționare; Manșon; Bandă; Bandaj; Altele
fr: Type de support de poignet: Attelle; Gant; Doublure; Positionneur; Manchon; Bande adhésive; Bande; Autre
it: Stile dell'ausilio per il polso: Tutore; Guanto; Fodera; Posizionatore; Manicotto; Nastro; Fascia; Altro
th: ข้อมือช่วยเหลือสไตล์: ที่ดาม; ถุงมือ; ซับใน; อุปกรณ์จัดท่า; ปลอกสวม; เทป; ผ้าพัน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Suporte de punho estilo: Órtese; Luva; Forro; Posicionador; Manga; Bandagem; Faixa; Outros
nl: Polsondersteunende stijl: Brace; Handschoen; Voering; Positioneerder; Sleeve; Tape; Wikkel; Overig